Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.411

Fees—Installment payments.

Each institution of higher education, at its discretion, may offer students an optional plan to pay in advance the building fees, operating fees, and services and activities fees for any quarter or semester in periodic installments, as established by that institution of higher education.

[ 1987 c 15 s 1; 1985 c 356 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 15: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1987." [ 1987 c 15 s 3.]

Report to legislature—1985 c 356: "Any institution of higher education offering a payment plan under RCW 28B.15.411, shall report to the legislature by January 1, 1988, about the effectiveness of the plan and costs of administering the plan." [ 1985 c 356 s 3.]